Indiana, session 2026, SB203.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 5-11-1-32 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 32. (a) The following definitions apply throughout
this section:
(1) "Corporation" refers to the Indiana economic
development corporation established by IC 5-28-3-1.
(2) "Nonprofit subsidiary" refers to a nonprofit subsidiary
corporation established under IC 5-28-5-13.
(3) "Ombudsman" means the individual designated as the
economic development ombudsman under subsection (b) for
the corporation and a nonprofit subsidiary.
(b) The state board of accounts shall act as the economic
development ombudsman for the corporation and a nonprofit
subsidiary. To carry out the duties set forth in this section, the state
board of accounts shall designate an individual to serve as the
2026 IN 203—LS 6531/DI 129


economic development ombudsman. The individual selected under
this subsection serves at the pleasure of the state board of accounts.
(c) The ombudsman shall carry out the following duties:
(1) Assist the state board of accounts with respect to:
(A) an examination of the corporation or a nonprofit
subsidiary; or
(B) a review of the examination of the corporation or a
nonprofit subsidiary conducted by a private examiner as
described in section 9 of this chapter.
(2) Conduct investigations related to fraud, waste, abuse,
mismanagement, and misconduct in the corporation or
nonprofit subsidiary.
(3) Conduct performance audits of programs of the
corporation or nonprofit subsidiary.
(4) Consult with outside management and economic
development experts to aid the ombudsman in carrying out
the duties under this section.
(5) Recommend policies to the general assembly that would do
any of the following:
(A) Increase public trust of the corporation's management
and spending of taxpayer resources.
(B) Increase the transparency of the corporation's
activities without sacrificing the corporation's economic
development mission as set forth in IC 5-28-1-1.
(C) Promote economic development in all parts of Indiana,
especially rural communities.
(D) Increase the opportunities for coordination and
collaboration with local communities throughout Indiana.
Any policy recommendations under this subdivision must be
made to the general assembly in an electronic format under
IC 5-14-6.
(6) Attend board meetings of the corporation and have access
to all board materials.
(d) This subsection applies if the ombudsman's budget is not
more than ninety-nine thousand dollars ($99,000). The ombudsman
shall bill the corporation for the costs incurred in carrying out the
duties under this section. The ombudsman's costs, including the
costs of any assistants under subsection (f), shall be paid from
appropriations made to the corporation.
(e) This subsection applies if the ombudsman's budget is more
than ninety-nine thousand dollars ($99,000). The ombudsman must
prepare a budget and provide the proposed budget to the state
2026 IN 203—LS 6531/DI 129


examiner and the corporation. The state examiner and the
corporation must provide written comments on the ombudsman's
proposed budget not later than fourteen (14) days after the date the
proposed budget is received. After the corporation and the state
examiner have provided written comments on the ombudsman's
proposed budget, the ombudsman shall provide the proposed
budget to the budget agency for review and approval. The budget
agency may:
(1) approve;
(2) approve with modifications; or
(3) deny;
the ombudsman's proposed budget. If the budget agency denies the
ombudsman's proposed budget, the ombudsman may prepare
another proposed budget and resubmit that budget in accordance
with the procedures set forth in this subsection. The costs incurred
by the ombudsman, including the costs of any assistants under
subsection (f), in carrying out the duties under this section shall be
paid from appropriations made to the corporation in accordance
with the budget approved under this subsection.
(f) Subject to the approval of the state examiner, the
ombudsman may employ or contract with assistants who are
necessary to assist the ombudsman in carrying out the duties under
this section and who meet the requirements applicable to the:
(1) appointment of a field examiner under section 8 of this
chapter; or
(2) engagement of a private examiner under section 24 of this
chapter.
(g) The corporation and a nonprofit subsidiary shall cooperate
with the ombudsman to carry out the purpose of this section.
(h) In carrying out any of the duties under this section, the
ombudsman has the same rights, powers, duties, and obligations as
the state examiner, deputy examiner, field examiner, or private
examiner when engaged in making any examination or when
engaged in any official duty delegated to that examiner by the state
examiner.
(i) This section does not confer authority on the state board of
accounts or the ombudsman to publicly release information where
public release of that information is prohibited, restricted, or
otherwise limited by any one (1) of the following:
(1) A contractual provision governing:
(A) access to; or
(B) public disclosure or release of;
2026 IN 203—LS 6531/DI 129


information.
(2) IC 5-14-1.5 (open door law).
(3) IC 5-14-3 (access to public records).
(4) IC 24-2-3 (Uniform Trade Secrets Act).
(5) Another law that prohibits, restricts, or limits public
access to the information.
SECTION 2. IC 5-28-4-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 60, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) The board is composed of the following
members: none of whom may be members of the general assembly:
(1) The governor.
(2) Eleven (11) individuals appointed by the governor.
(3) The members (if any) appointed by the governor under
subsection (c).
(4) Two (2) nonvoting, advisory members who are members
of the general assembly appointed under subsection (d).
The individuals appointed under subdivision (2) and the individuals
appointed under subsection (c) must be employed in or retired from the
private or nonprofit sector or academia and may not be members of
the general assembly.
(b) When making appointments under subsection (a)(2), the
governor shall appoint the following:
(1) At least five (5) members belonging to the same political party
as the governor.
(2) At least three (3) members who belong to a major political
party (as defined in IC 3-5-2.1-62) other than the party of which
the governor is a member.
(c) In addition to the members appointed under subsection (a)(2),
the governor may appoint not more than three (3) additional members
to the board. If the governor appoints more than one (1) additional
member to the board under this subsection, at least one (1) of the
additional members must belong to a major political party (as defined
in IC 3-5-2.1-62) other than the party of which the governor is a
member.
(d) The members described in subsection (a)(4) are appointed as
follows:
(1) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint
one (1) individual who is a member of the house of
representatives.
(2) The president pro tempore of the senate shall appoint one
(1) individual who is a member of the senate.
(e) The following apply to the members appointed under
2026 IN 203—LS 6531/DI 129


subsection (d):
(1) A member appointed under subsection (d):
(A) serves at the pleasure of the member's appointing
authority; and
(B) may be reappointed to successive terms.
(2) A vacancy in an appointment under subsection (d)(1) shall
be filled by the speaker of the house of representatives.
(3) A vacancy in an appointment under subsection (d)(2) shall
be filled by the president pro tempore of the senate.
(4) An individual appointed to fill a vacancy in an
appointment under subsection (d) serves for the unexpired
term of the individual's predecessor.
SECTION 3. IC 5-28-4-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.237-2017,
SECTION 16, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) Except as provided in subsection (d), the
term of office of an appointed member of the board is four (4) years.
(b) Each member appointed under section 2(a)(2) or 2(c) of this
chapter holds office for the term of appointment and continues to serve
after expiration of the appointment until a successor is appointed and
qualified. A member is eligible for reappointment.
(c) Members of the board appointed under section 2(a)(2) or 2(c) of
this chapter serve at the pleasure of the governor.
(d) This subsection applies to a member of the board appointed
under section 2(d) of this chapter. The initial term of a member is
one (1) year and expires June 30, 2027. The term of a member is
two (2) years and expires June 30 of the odd-numbered year.
SECTION 4. IC 5-28-4-5, AS ADDED BY P.L.4-2005, SECTION
34, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]: Sec. 5. (a) The members of the board who are not members of
the general assembly:
(1) are entitled to a salary per diem for attending meetings equal
to the per diem provided by law for members of the general
assembly; The members of the board and
(2) are also entitled to receive reimbursement for traveling
expenses as provided under IC 4-13-1-4 and other expenses
actually incurred in connection with the members' duties as
approved by the budget agency.
(b) Each member of the board who is a member of the general
assembly is entitled to receive the same per diem, mileage, and
travel allowances paid to legislative members of interim study
committees established by the legislative council. Per diem,
mileage, and travel allowances paid under this subsection shall be
2026 IN 203—LS 6531/DI 129


paid from appropriations made to the legislative council or
legislative services agency.
SECTION 5. IC 5-28-4-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.237-2017,
SECTION 17, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) The following constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business by the board of the corporation:
(1) Seven (7) voting members of the board, if:
(A) no additional members are appointed under section 2(c) of
this chapter; or
(B) one (1) additional member is appointed under section 2(c)
of this chapter.
(2) Eight (8) voting members of the board, if either two (2) or
three (3) additional members are appointed under section 2(c) of
this chapter.
(b) The following number of affirmative votes is necessary for
action to be taken by the board:
(1) The affirmative vote of at least seven (7) members, if:
(A) no additional members are appointed under section 2(c) of
this chapter; or
(B) one (1) additional member is appointed under section 2(c)
of this chapter.
(2) The affirmative vote of at least eight (8) members, if either
two (2) or three (3) additional members are appointed under
section 2(c) of this chapter.
(c) Members of the board may not vote by proxy.
SECTION 6. IC 5-28-6-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.116-2025,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) The corporation shall develop and promote
programs designed to make the best use of Indiana resources to ensure
a balanced economy and continuing economic growth for Indiana, and,
for those purposes, may do the following:
(1) Cooperate with federal, state, and local governments and
agencies in the coordination of programs to make the best use of
Indiana resources, based on a statewide study to determine
specific economic sectors that should be emphasized by the state
and by local economic development organizations within
geographic regions in Indiana, and encourage collaboration with
local economic development organizations within geographic
regions in Indiana and with the various state economic
development organizations within the states contiguous to
Indiana.
(2) Receive and expend funds, grants, gifts, and contributions of
2026 IN 203—LS 6531/DI 129


money, property, labor, interest accrued from loans made by the
corporation, and other things of value from public and private
sources, including grants from agencies and instrumentalities of
the state and the federal government. The corporation:
(A) may accept federal grants for providing planning
assistance, making grants, or providing other services or
functions necessary to political subdivisions, planning
commissions, or other public or private organizations;
(B) shall administer these grants in accordance with the terms
of the grants; and
(C) may contract with political subdivisions, planning
commissions, or other public or private organizations to carry
out the purposes for which the grants were made.
(3) Direct that assistance, information, and advice regarding the
duties and functions of the corporation be given to the corporation
by an officer, agent, or employee of the executive branch of the
state. The head of any other state department or agency may
assign one (1) or more of the department's or agency's employees
to the corporation on a temporary basis or may direct a division
or an agency under the department's or agency's supervision and
control to make a special study or survey requested by the
corporation.
(b) The corporation shall perform the following duties:
(1) Develop and implement industrial development programs to
encourage expansion of existing industrial, commercial, and
business facilities in Indiana and to encourage new industrial,
commercial, and business locations in Indiana.
(2) Assist businesses and industries in acquiring, improving, and
developing overseas markets and encourage international plant
locations in Indiana. The corporation, with the approval of the
governor, may establish foreign offices to assist in this function.
However, the corporation may not establish, and the governor
may not approve the establishment of, a foreign office in a foreign
country described in 15 CFR 791.4.
(3) Promote the growth of minority business enterprises by doing
the following:
(A) Mobilizing and coordinating the activities, resources, and
efforts of governmental and private agencies, businesses, trade
associations, institutions, and individuals.
(B) Assisting minority businesses in obtaining governmental
or commercial financing for expansion or establishment of
new businesses or individual development projects.
2026 IN 203—LS 6531/DI 129


(C) Aiding minority businesses in procuring contracts from
governmental or private sources, or both.
(D) Providing technical, managerial, and counseling assistance
to minority business enterprises.
(4) Assist the office of the lieutenant governor in:
(A) community economic development planning;
(B) implementation of programs designed to further
community economic development; and
(C) the development and promotion of Indiana's tourist
resources.
(5) Assist the secretary of agriculture and rural development in
promoting and marketing of Indiana's agricultural products and
provide assistance to the director of the Indiana state department
of agriculture.
(6) With the approval of the governor, implement federal
programs delegated to the state to carry out the purposes of this
article.
(7) Promote the growth of small businesses by doing the
following:
(A) Assisting small businesses in obtaining and preparing the
permits required to conduct business in Indiana.
(B) Serving as a liaison between small businesses and state
agencies.
(C) Providing information concerning business assistance
programs available through government agencies and private
sources.
(8) Establish a transparency portal on its current website. The
page must provide the following:
(A) By program, cumulative information on the total amount
of incentives awarded, the total number of companies that
received the incentives and were assisted in a year, and the
names and addresses of those companies.
(B) A mechanism on the page whereby the public may request
further information online about specific programs or
incentives awarded.
(C) A mechanism for the public to receive an electronic
response.
(D) Access to the following:
(i) Any information or report that is required by statute to be
included in the economic incentives and compliance report
submitted under IC 5-28-28.
(ii) Final offer of public financial resources to which the
2026 IN 203—LS 6531/DI 129


corporation is a party.
(iii) Reports that the corporation submitted to the general
assembly.
(9) Establish a dashboard that is easily accessible from either
the corporation's website or the transparency portal (or both)
to convey economic development data in an easily
understandable manner that deploys charts and graphs. The
dashboard must include at least the following information:
(A) Longitudinal representations of economic development
data derived primarily from the elements that are required
under IC 5-28-28-6 to be included in the economic
incentives and compliance report.
(B) Depictions of:
(i) the amount of tax money spent on economic
development;
(ii) the number of actual jobs created, and the number of
jobs expected to be created;
(iii) a ratio showing tax money spent per job created;
(iv) the distribution by county or region where tax
money was spent and jobs were created; and
(v) how the corporation spends tax money and generates
revenue.
(c) The corporation may do the following:
(1) Disseminate information concerning the industrial,
commercial, governmental, educational, cultural, recreational,
agricultural, and other advantages of Indiana.
(2) Plan, direct, and conduct research activities.
(3) Assist in community economic development planning and the
implementation of programs designed to further community
economic development.
(d) The dashboard required to be established under subsection
(b)(9) may also include the following information:
(1) A ratio projecting the tax money spent relative to tax
revenue generated from the corporation's activities.
(2) Average wages of new jobs attracted to Indiana or
expected to be attracted to Indiana.
SECTION 7. IC 5-28-6-2.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 2.5. (a) The corporation shall analyze the
potential impact of a proposed economic development investment
on the costs to provide the following utility services to ratepayers:
(1) Water.
2026 IN 203—LS 6531/DI 129


(2) Wastewater.
(3) Electricity.
(4) Natural gas.
(b) In performing the analysis under subsection (a), the
corporation must consider each of the following:
(1) The existing utility infrastructure available to serve the
project.
(2) Any new utility infrastructure needed to serve the project.
(3) Water resource availability for the project.
(c) For any proposed economic development investment that is
projected to negatively impact ratepayers for a utility service listed
in subsection (a), the corporation shall develop and implement a
mitigation plan to offset the costs of providing any or all of the
utility services listed in subsection (a) that are associated with the
project.
(d) In performing the analysis under subsection (a) and
preparing a mitigation plan under subsection (c) (if mitigation is
required), the corporation may consult with the following:
(1) The Indiana utility regulatory commission.
(2) The department of natural resources.
(3) Utilities that provide any of the utility services listed in
subsection (a) to the ratepayers located in the area of the
project.
(4) Counties, cities, towns, and other political subdivisions
located in the area of the project.
(5) Consumer and ratepayer advocates.
SECTION 8. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 203—LS 6531/DI 129